Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1746
Liability of members.

The members of the credit union shall not be personally or individually liable for the payment of its debts solely by virtue of holding membership in the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 46.